Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2050.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4 of the act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the Pharmacy Act, is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 4. Permit to Conduct a Pharmacy.--* * *(a.1) A pharmacy benefits manager may not acquire or hold, directly or indirectly, a permit to operate a pharmacy for the retail sale of drugs or medicines in this Commonwealth. On or after the effective date of this subsection, the board shall revoke or refuse to renew a permit held in violation of this subsection. The following shall apply:(1) The board may issue a limited-use permit to a pharmacy 12345678910111213141516171819 that would otherwise be prohibited under this subsection if the pharmacy provides access to a rare, orphan or limited-distribution drug that is otherwise unavailable in the market to patients or pharmacies.(2) Before revoking or refusing to renew a permit under this subsection, the board may assess whether the pharmacy provides access to a drug described under clause (1).(3) If the board determines under clause (1) that the drug is otherwise unavailable in the market, the board shall convert the permit to a limited-use permit for a period of not less than ninety days.(4) The board shall adopt a written policy to implement the process to conduct assessments and make determinations under clauses (2) and (3). The policy shall include all of the following:(i) Procedures for patients, pharmacies or health care providers to notify the board of an unavailable drug described under clause (1).(ii) Procedures for a pharmacy to request a limited-use permit.(iii) Deadlines for the board's determinations under clause (3).(iv) Emergency procedures for patient need.(5) If a pharmacy subject to this subsection is undergoing a pending sale to an eligible buyer and the pharmacy provides same-day access to pharmacist services, prescriptions for controlled substances, mental health services or other critical patient health services, the board may extend or renew the pharmacy's permit for a limited period.(6) This subsection shall not apply to a pharmacy employer 20250HB2050PN2628 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and a pharmacy that:(i) holds a direct or indirect interest in a pharmacy benefits manager;(ii) has a relationship in which the pharmacy employer is the sole client located in this Commonwealth of the pharmacy benefits manager in which the pharmacy employer holds a direct or indirect interest; and(iii) provides pharmacy services exclusively to the employes and dependents of the pharmacy employer through the affiliated pharmacy benefits manager in this Commonwealth.(7) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this clause unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:(i) "Permit" means a p ermit issued by the board under this section to operate a pharmacy for the retail sale of drugs or medicines in this Commonwealth, including an active permit, a renewed permit or a permit subject to suspension, revocation or nonrenewal.(ii) "Pharmacy benefits manager" means the term as defined in section 103 of the act of November 21, 2016 (P.L.1318, No.169), known as the "Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act."(a.2) The board shall assess each permit issued under this section as of July 1, 2026, and provide notice to a permit holder who the board reasonably believes will be in violation of subsection (a.1). The board shall provide the notice via certified mail or email at least ninety days before January 1, 2027. The following shall apply:(1) The notice shall include all of the following:(i) A list of pharmacy benefits managers with a direct or 20250HB2050PN2628 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 indirect interest in a permit held by the permit holder.(ii) Contact information for the board, including a monitored phone number and email address.(iii) Except as provided under clause (2), a list of Pennsylvania pharmacies with permits that the board does not reasonably expect to be in violation of subsection (a.1) as of January 1, 2027. The list shall include all of the following for each pharmacy:(A) Name.(B) Phone number.(C) Physical address.(D) Publicly accessible Internet website, if available.(E) Email address, if available.(2) If the board maintains a publicly accessible Internet website containing the information required under clause (1)(iii), the board may include the publicly accessible Internet website address in the notice under clause (1) in lieu of the list under clause (1)(iii).(3) A permit holder that receives notice under clause (1) shall provide notice to each patient and each prescribing health care provider who used the pharmacy within the preceding twelve months. The permit holder shall provide the notice via certified mail, email or patient portal at least sixty days before January 1, 2027, and shall inform the recipient that the pharmacy will no longer be authorized to dispense retail drugs or medicines on or after January 1, 2027. The notice shall include the information specified under clause (1)(iii) as provided to the permit holder by the board.(4) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this clause 20250HB2050PN2628 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:(i) "Permit" means p ermit issued by the board under this section to operate a pharmacy for the retail sale of drugs or medicines in this Commonwealth, including an active permit, a renewed permit or a permit subject to suspension, revocation or nonrenewal.(ii) "Pharmacy benefits manager" means the term as defined in section 103 of the "Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act."* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:The addition of section 4(a.1)(4) of the act.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2050PN2628 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516